Tennessee statutes. Title 28 Limitation Of Actions
Part 2

Limitations on Actions for Defective Improvement of Real Estate

28-3-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, the terms set out hereinbelow are defined as follows:

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, business, trust, unincorporated organization, association or joint stock company; and

“Substantial completion” means that degree of completion of a project, improvement, or a specified area or portion thereof (in accordance with the contract documents, as modified by any change orders agreed to by the parties) upon attainment of which the owner can use the same for the purpose for which it was intended; the date of substantial completion may be established by written agreement between the contractor and the owner.

Acts 1965, ch. 353, § 5; T.C.A., § 28-318.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, §§ 4, 15, 17.

Law Reviews.

Accrual of Cause of Action in Products Liability and Other Tort Actions, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 593.

Constitutional Law — Limitation of Actions — Application of the Products Liability Statute of Repose, 52 Tenn. L. Rev. 97 (1984).

Products Liability — Lessors as Warrantors of Fitness in Tennessee, 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 303 (1986).

Statutes of Limitations — Personal Injury, Property Damage and Breach of Warranty, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 803.

The Expanding Liability of Design Professionals, 20 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 611 (1991).

When the Earth Moves and Buildings Tumble, Who Will Pay? — Tort Liability and Defenses for Earthquake Damage within the New Madrid Fault Zone, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1991).

28-3-202. Limitation of actions.

All actions, arbitrations, or other binding dispute resolution proceedings to recover damages for any deficiency in the design, planning, supervision, observation of construction, or construction of an improvement to real property, for injury to property, real or personal, arising out of any such deficiency, or for injury to the person or for wrongful death arising out of any such deficiency, must be brought against any person performing or furnishing the design, planning, supervision, observation of construction, or construction of the improvement within four (4) years after substantial completion of an improvement.

Acts 1965, ch. 353, § 1; 1980, ch. 811, § 1; T.C.A., § 28-314; Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 38.

Compiler's Notes. This section is set out to remove “, or land surveying in connection with,” preceding “such an improvement” at the end of the section pursuant to the amendment to this section by Acts 1980, ch. 811.

Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “, arbitrations, or other binding dispute resolution proceedings” and made stylistic changes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Accrual of Cause of Action in Products Liability and Other Tort Actions, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 593.

New Home Construction Liability (Jeff Mueller), 43 Tenn. B.J. 18 (2007).

Paine on Procedure: The Construction Statute of Repose (Donald F. Paine), 44 Tenn. B.J. 37 (2008).

Statutes of Limitations — Personal Injury, Property Damage and Breach of Warranty, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 803.

The Tolling of Statutes of Limitations in Tennessee, 14 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375 (1984).

Torts — Statute of Limitations — Employee Injured Using Employer's Equipment, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 608.

Torts — Statute of Limitations — Personal Injury — Defect in Real Estate Construction, 38 Tenn. L. Rev. 613.

28-3-203. Injury during fourth year after completion — Limitation of action.

Notwithstanding § 28-3-202, in the case of an injury to property or person or injury causing wrongful death, which injury occurred during the fourth year after substantial completion, an action, arbitration, or other binding dispute resolution proceeding to recover damages for the injury or wrongful death must be brought within one (1) year after the date on which the injury occurred, without respect to the date of death of the injured person.

The action, arbitration, or other binding dispute resolution proceeding must, in all events, be brought within five (5) years after the substantial completion of the improvement.

Acts 1965, ch. 353, § 2; T.C.A., § 28-315; Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 39.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “, arbitration, or other binding dispute resolution proceeding” for “in court” in (a); in (b), substituted “The action, arbitration, or other binding dispute resolution proceeding must” for “Such action shall”; and made stylistic changes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Accrual of Cause of Action in Products Liability and Other Tort Action, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 593.

Statutes of Limitations — Personal Injury, Property Damage and Breach of Warranty, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 803.

28-3-204. Periods otherwise fixed not extended — New cause of action not created.

This part does not extend the period or periods provided by the laws of this state or by agreement between the parties for the bringing of any action, arbitration, or other binding dispute resolution proceeding.

This part does not create any cause of action not previously existing or recognized.

Acts 1965, ch. 353, §§ 3, 6; T.C.A., § 28-316; Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 40.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “Nothing in this part shall be construed as extending the period or periods provided by the laws of Tennessee or by agreement between the parties for the bringing of any action.”; and in (b), substituted “does not create” for “shall not be construed as creating” and “previously” for “heretofore”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Accrual of Cause of Action in Products Liability and Other Tort Actions, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 593.

Statutes of Limitations — Personal Injury, Property Damage and Breach of Warranty, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 803.

28-3-205. Limitation not defense under certain circumstances.

The limitation provided by this part must not be asserted as a defense by any person in actual possession or the control, as owner, tenant, or otherwise, of an improvement at the time any deficiency in the improvement constitutes the proximate cause of the injury or death for which it is proposed to bring an action, arbitration, or other binding dispute resolution proceeding.

The limitation provided by this part is not available as a defense to any person who has been guilty of fraud in performing or furnishing the design, planning, supervision, observation of construction, construction of, or land surveying, in connection with an improvement, or to any person who wrongfully conceals any such cause of action.

Acts 1965, ch. 353, § 4; T.C.A., § 28-317; Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 41.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added “, arbitration, or other binding dispute resolution proceeding.” in (a); and substituted “provided by this part is not available” for “hereby provided shall not be available” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Accrual of Cause of Action in Products Liability and Other Tort Actions, 42 Tenn. L. Rev. 593.

Statutes of Limitations — Personal Injury, Property Damage and Breach of Warranty, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 803.